Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-201
Act, how cited.

Sections 9-201 to 9-266 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Bingo Act.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 50;

Laws 1979, LB 164, § 18;

Laws 1983, LB 259, § 34;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 46;

Laws 1985, LB 486, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 17;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-173;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 295, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 427, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 429, § 1.